Maryland, session 2025, SB1037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
2–1302.5.
AFTER MAKING THE DISTRIBUTIONS REQUIRED UNDER §§ 2–1301 THROUGH
2–1302.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE SALES
TAX COLLECTED UNDER § 11–102(C)(3) OF THIS ARTICLE TO THE CITY OF
BALTIMORE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1037*

SENATE BILL 1037
2–1303.
After making the distributions required under §§ 2–1301 through [2–1302.4]
2–1302.5 of this subtitle, the Comptroller shall pay:
(1) revenues from the hotel surcharge into the Dorchester County
Economic Development Fund established under § 10–130 of the Economic Development
Article;
(2) to the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund established under § 5–206
of the Education Article, the following percentage of the remaining sales and use tax
revenues:
(i) for fiscal year 2023, 9.2%;
(ii) for fiscal year 2024, 11.0%;
(iii) for fiscal year 2025, 11.3%;
(iv) for fiscal year 2026, 11.7%; and
(v) for fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, 12.1%; and
(3) the remaining sales and use tax revenue into the General Fund of the
State.
11–102.
(c) (1) A county, municipal corporation, special taxing district, or other
political subdivision of the State may not impose any retail sales or use tax except:
(i) a sales tax or use tax that was in effect on January 1, 1971;
(ii) a tax on the sale or use of:
1. fuels;
2. utilities;
3. space rentals; or
4. any controlled dangerous substance, as defined in § 5–101
of the Criminal Law Article, unless the sale is made by a person who registers under and
complies with Title 5, Subtitle 3 of the Criminal Law Article; [or]

SENATE BILL 1037 3
(iii) a tax imposed by a code county on the sale or use of food and
beverages authorized under § 20–602 of the Local Government Article; OR
(IV) A TAX IMPOSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (3) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection may not be construed as conferring
authority to impose a sales and use tax.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY MAY IMPOSE, BY LAW, A SALES TAX
ON RETAIL SALES OF TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY AND TAXABLE SERVICES IN
THE CITY OF BALTIMORE.
(II) THE SALES TAX IMPOSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. IS SUBJECT TO THE SCOPE AND LIMITATIONS OF THIS
TITLE; AND
2. SHALL BE COLLECTED AND ADMINISTERED IN THE
SAME MANNER AS THE STATE SALES AND USE TAX IMPOSED UNDER THIS TITLE.
(III) THE RATE OF THE SALES TAX IMPOSED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED 2% OF THE
TAXABLE PRICE OF THE TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY OR TAXABLE SERVICE.
(IV) BALTIMORE CITY SHALL GIVE THE COMPTROLLER NOTICE
OF THE IMPOSITION OF A SALES TAX UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH AND NOTICE OF ANY
ALTERATION OF THE RATE OF THE SALES TAX AT LEAST 6 MONTHS BEFORE ITS
EFFECTIVE DATE.
11–104.
(L) (1) THE SALES TAX RATE FOR A RETAIL SALE OF TANGIBLE PERSONAL
PROPERTY OR A TAXABLE SERVICE IN THE CITY OF BALTIMORE IS, SUBJECT TO THE
LIMITATIONS OF § 11–102(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE RATE SPECIFIED IN LAW BY
THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY.
(2) THE SALES TAX RATE DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS IN ADDITION TO THE RATES OTHERWISE SPECIFIED UNDER THIS
SECTION.

SENATE BILL 1037
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.